Tennessee, session 114, HB1147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-704, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(j) The corporation shall submit an annual report to the education committee of
the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over
postsecondary education detailing, for each of the five (5) immediately preceding
academic years for which the corporation awarded scholarships pursuant to this section,
the amount appropriated by the general assembly for the scholarship program, the total
number of scholarship applications received by the corporation, the total number of
scholarship recipients, and the average scholarship award amount. The corporation
shall submit the report by July 31, 2025, and by each July 31 thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1147
001807
- 1 -